Utah statutes.
72-10-404.   Zoning ordinances -- Governing law in event of conflict.
(1) In the event that a political subdivision has adopted or adopts a
comprehensive zoning ordinance regulating the height of buildings, any airport
zoning regulations applicable to the same area or a portion of the area may be
incorporated in and made a part of comprehensive zoning regulations, and be
administered and enforced in connection with the comprehensive zoning
regulations.
(2)  In the event of conflict between any airport zoning regulations adopted
under this part and any other regulations applicable to the same area, whether
the conflict be with respect to the height of structures or trees, the use of
land, or any other matter, and whether the other regulations were adopted by
the political subdivision which adopted the airport zoning regulations or by
some other political subdivision, the more stringent limitation or requirement
shall govern and prevail.
